mandarin_compounds.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +V +ADJ +ADV +PRON +OBJ +ACT +RES +PROP +HUM +LOC +TIME +ABSTRACT

LEXICON Root
NounRoots ;
VerbRoots ;
AdjRoots ;
AdvRoots ;
PronRoots ;

LEXICON NounRoots
草:草+N+OBJ NextCompound;
蛋:蛋+N+OBJ NextCompound;
床:床+N+OBJ NextCompound;
鸡:鸡+N+OBJ NextCompound;
肉:肉+N+OBJ NextCompound;
鸟:鸟+N+OBJ NextCompound;
信:信+N+ABSTRACT NextCompound;
信:信+N+OBJ NextCompound;
歌:歌+N+OBJ NextCompound;
字:字+N+OBJ NextCompound;
铁:铁+N+OBJ NextCompound;
奶:奶+N+OBJ NextCompound;
脸:脸+N+OBJ NextCompound;
国:国+N+LOC NextCompound;
雨:雨+N+ABSTRACT NextCompound;
福:福+N+ABSTRACT NextCompound;
证:证+N+ABSTRACT NextCompound;
土:土+N+OBJ NextCompound;
北:北+N+LOC NextCompound;
刀:刀+N+OBJ NextCompound;
时:时+N+TIME NextCompound;
墙:墙+N+OBJ NextCompound;
船:船+N+OBJ NextCompound;
树:树+N+OBJ NextCompound;
碗:碗+N+OBJ NextCompound;
边:边+N+LOC NextCompound;
后:后+N+LOC NextCompound;
课:课+N+OBJ NextCompound;
烟:烟+N+OBJ NextCompound;
夜:夜+N+TIME NextCompound;
米:米+N+OBJ NextCompound;
人:人+N+HUM NextCompound;
鱼:鱼+N+OBJ NextCompound;
钱:钱+N+OBJ NextCompound;
毛:毛+N+OBJ NextCompound;
级:级+N+ABSTRACT NextCompound;
系:系+N+ABSTRACT NextCompound;
书:书+N+OBJ NextCompound;
河:河+N+OBJ NextCompound;
钟:钟+N+OBJ NextCompound;
风:风+N+ABSTRACT NextCompound;
数:数+N+ABSTRACT NextCompound "weight: 0.5" ;
能:能+N+ABSTRACT NextCompound "weight: 0.5" ;
发:发+N+OBJ NextCompound "weight: 0.5" ;
回:回+N+ABSTRACT NextCompound "weight: 0.5" ;
背:背+N+OBJ NextCompound "weight: 0.5" ;
亲:亲+N+HUM NextCompound;
头:头+N+OBJ NextCompound;
干:干+N+OBJ NextCompound "weight: 1.0" ;
干:干+N+ABSTRACT NextCompound ;
晚:晚+N+TIME NextCompound;
别:别+N+ABSTRACT NextCompound "weight: 1.5" ;
才:才+N+ABSTRACT NextCompound;
记:记+N+HUM NextCompound;
念:念+N+ABSTRACT NextCompound;
美:美+N+LOC NextCompound "weight: 0.5" ;
平:平+N+LOC NextCompound;
拍:拍+N+OBJ NextCompound;
贵:贵+N+HUM NextCompound;
起:起+N+TIME NextCompound;

LEXICON VerbRoots
缺:缺+V+ACT NextCompound;
订:订+V+ACT NextCompound;
念:念+V+ACT NextCompound;
办:办+V+ACT NextCompound;
数:数+V+ACT NextCompound "weight: 1.0" ;
能:能+V+RES NextCompound "weight: 1.0" ;
争:争+V+ACT NextCompound;
住:住+V+ACT NextCompound;
完:完+V+RES NextCompound;
跳:跳+V+ACT NextCompound;
见:见+V+RES NextCompound;
卖:卖+V+ACT NextCompound;
喝:喝+V+ACT NextCompound;
发:发+V+ACT NextCompound;
看:看+V+ACT NextCompound;
跑:跑+V+ACT NextCompound;
拍:拍+V+ACT NextCompound;
养:养+V+ACT NextCompound;
演:演+V+ACT NextCompound;
回:回+V+ACT NextCompound;
交:交+V+ACT NextCompound;
记:记+V+ACT NextCompound;
飞:飞+V+ACT NextCompound;
动:动+V+ACT NextCompound;
动:动+V+RES NextCompound;
起:起+V+ACT NextCompound;
起:起+V+RES NextCompound;
约:约+V+ACT NextCompound;
提:提+V+ACT NextCompound;
背:背+V+ACT NextCompound "weight: 0.5" ;
配:配+V+ACT NextCompound;
祝:祝+V+ACT NextCompound;
信:信+V+ACT NextCompound "weight: 1.0" ;
歌:歌+V+ACT NextCompound "weight: 1.0" ;
奶:奶+V+ACT NextCompound "weight: 1.0" ;
系:系+V+ACT NextCompound "weight: 0.5" ;
书:书+V+ACT NextCompound "weight: 1.5" ;
钟:钟+V+ACT NextCompound "weight: 1.0" ;
亲:亲+V+ACT NextCompound ;
美:美+V+ACT NextCompound "weight: 1.0" ;
干:干+V+ACT NextCompound;
好:好+V+ACT NextCompound "weight: 1.0" ;
新:新+V+ACT NextCompound "weight: 1.0" ;
别:别+V+ACT NextCompound "weight: 1.0" ;
短:短+V+ACT NextCompound ;

LEXICON AdjRoots
白:白+ADJ+PROP NextCompound;
贵:贵+ADJ+PROP NextCompound;
绿:绿+ADJ+PROP NextCompound;
忙:忙+ADJ+PROP NextCompound;
紧:紧+ADJ+PROP NextCompound;
亲:亲+ADJ+PROP NextCompound;
头:头+ADJ+PROP NextCompound "weight: 1.0" ;
短:短+ADJ+PROP NextCompound;
旧:旧+ADJ+PROP NextCompound;
慢:慢+ADJ+PROP NextCompound;
美:美+ADJ+PROP NextCompound;
干:干+ADJ+PROP NextCompound;
平:平+ADJ+PROP NextCompound;
近:近+ADJ+PROP NextCompound;
渴:渴+ADJ+PROP NextCompound;
晚:晚+ADJ+PROP NextCompound "weight: 1.0" ;
好:好+ADJ+RES NextCompound;
好:好+ADJ+PROP NextCompound;
高:高+ADJ+PROP NextCompound;
深:深+ADJ+PROP NextCompound;
新:新+ADJ+PROP NextCompound;
北:北+ADJ+PROP NextCompound "weight: 0.5" ;
边:边+ADJ+PROP NextCompound "weight: 0.5" ;
完:完+ADJ+PROP NextCompound ;
动:动+ADJ+PROP NextCompound ;
飞:飞+ADJ+PROP NextCompound ;
福:福+ADJ+PROP NextCompound ;
初:初+ADJ+PROP NextCompound;
别:别+ADJ+PROP NextCompound "weight: 0.2" ;
先:先+ADJ+PROP NextCompound "weight: 1.0" ;

LEXICON AdvRoots
先:先+ADV NextCompound;
才:才+ADV NextCompound "weight: 0.5" ;
也:也+ADV NextCompound;
初:初+ADV NextCompound "weight: 0.5" ;
别:别+ADV NextCompound;
后:后+ADV NextCompound "weight: 0.5" ;
起:起+ADV NextCompound "weight: 1.0" ;
白:白+ADV NextCompound "weight: 1.0" ;

LEXICON PronRoots
咱:咱+PRON NextCompound;
它:它+PRON NextCompound;
哪:哪+PRON NextCompound;
这:这+PRON NextCompound;
他:他+PRON NextCompound;

LEXICON NextCompound
0:%  NounRoots ;
0:%  VerbRoots ;
0:%  AdjRoots ;
0:%  AdvRoots ;
0:%  PronRoots ;
# ;

END
